Massachusetts, session 194th, H1533.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subparagraph:-   
(H) At least one month prior to the opening of any overflow emergency shelter site, the 
director of the emergency shelter program, or their designee, shall hold at least one community 
meeting in the host community related to said emergency overflow shelter site, provided that 
notice for the meeting shall be posted on the website for the executive office of housing and 
livable communities and a copy of the notice shall be sent to the host community.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.